da: Kilde til lydafspilning: AUX-linjeindgang; App-baseret (tilhørende app); Bluetooth-streaming (fra telefon/tablet); Indbyggede sange; Cd/cdg; FM-radio; MicroSD-/SD-kort; USB-stik; Andet
nl: Audio afspeelbron: AUX line-in; Via app (bijbehorende app); Bluetooth-streaming (vanaf telefoon/tablet); Ingebouwde nummers; CD/CDG; FM-radio; MicroSD-/SD-kaart; USB-stick; Overige
th: แหล่งที่มาของการเล่นเสียง: AUX line-in; ผ่านแอป (แอปที่ใช้ร่วมกัน); สตรีมผ่านบลูทูธ (จากโทรศัพท์/แท็บเล็ต); เพลงในตัว; CD/CDG; วิทยุ FM; การ์ด MicroSD/SD; แฟลชไดรฟ์ USB; อื่นๆ
fr: Source de lecture audio: Entrée ligne AUX; Basé sur l’application (application compagnon); Diffusion Bluetooth (depuis téléphone/tablette); Chansons intégrées; CD/CDG; Radio FM; Carte MicroSD/SD; Clé USB; Autre
en: Audio playback source: AUX line-in; App-based (companion app); Bluetooth streaming (from phone/tablet); Built-in songs; CD/CDG; FM radio; MicroSD/SD card; USB flash drive; Other
zh-CN: 音频播放源: AUX 线路输入; 基于应用（配套应用）; 蓝牙流媒体（来自手机/平板电脑）; 内置歌曲; CD/CDG; FM 收音机; MicroSD/SD 卡; USB 闪存盘; 其他
fi: Äänentoiston lähde: AUX-linjatulo; Sovelluspohjainen (kumppanisovellus); Bluetooth-suoratoisto (puhelimesta tai tabletista); Sisäänrakennetut kappaleet; CD/CDG; FM-radio; MicroSD-/SD-kortti; USB-muistitikku; Muu
sv: Ljuduppspelningskälla: AUX-linjeingång; Appbaserad (tillhörande app); Bluetooth-strömning (från telefon/surfplatta); Inbyggda låtar; CD/CDG; FM-radio; MicroSD-/SD-kort; USB-minne; Annat
nb: Kilde for lydavspilling: AUX-linjeinngang; App-basert (tilhørende app); Bluetooth-strømming (fra telefon/nettbrett); Innebygde sanger; CD/CDG; FM-radio; MicroSD-/SD-kort; USB-minnepenn; Annet
hr-HR: Izvor reprodukcije glazbe: AUX linijski ulaz; Putem aplikacije (povezana aplikacija); Strujanje putem Bluetootha (s telefona/tableta); Ugrađene pjesme; CD/CDG; FM radio; MicroSD/SD kartica; USB memorijski pogon; Ostalo
es: Fuente de reproducción de audio: Entrada de línea AUX; Basado en app (app complementaria); Transmisión por Bluetooth (desde teléfono o tablet); Canciones integradas; CD/CDG; Radio FM; Tarjeta microSD/SD; Unidad flash USB; Otra
zh-TW: 音訊播放來源: AUX 線路輸入; 以 app 為基礎 (隨附 app); 藍牙串流 (來自手機/平板電腦); 內建歌曲; CD/CDG; FM 廣播; MicroSD/SD 記憶卡; USB 隨身碟; 其他
sl-SI: Vir predvajanja zvoka: Linijski vhod AUX; Aplikacija (spremljevalna aplikacija); Pretakanje Bluetooth (s telefona/tablice); Vgrajene pesmi; CD/CDG; FM radio; Kartica MicroSD/SD; Ključek USB; Drugo
it: Sorgente di riproduzione audio: Ingresso di linea AUX; Basato su app (app complementare); Streaming Bluetooth (da telefono/tablet); Canzoni integrate; CD/CDG; Radio FM; Scheda microSD/SD; Chiavetta USB; Altro
pt-PT: Fonte de reprodução de áudio: Entrada de linha AUX; Baseado em app (app complementar); Transmissão por Bluetooth (de telemóvel/tablet); Músicas integradas; CD/CDG; Rádio FM; Cartão MicroSD/SD; Unidade flash USB; Outros
pl: Źródło odtwarzania audio: Wejście liniowe AUX; Oparte na aplikacji (aplikacja towarzysząca); Przesyłanie strumieniowe Bluetooth (z telefonu/tabletu); Wbudowane utwory; CD/CDG; Radio FM; Karta MicroSD/SD; Pamięć USB; Inne
ja: 音声再生ソース: AUX ライン入力; アプリベース (コンパニオンアプリ); Bluetooth ストリーミング (スマートフォン・タブレットから); 内蔵曲; CD/CDG; FM ラジオ; MicroSD/SD カード; USB フラッシュドライブ; その他
pt-BR: Fonte de reprodução de áudio: Entrada de linha AUX; Baseado em app (app complementar); Streaming Bluetooth (de celular/tablet); Músicas embutidas; CD/CDG; Rádio FM; Cartão MicroSD/SD; Pendrive USB; Outro
lt-LT: Garso atkūrimo šaltinis: AUX linijinė įvestis; Per programėlę (susijusi programėlė); Srautinis perdavimas „Bluetooth“ ryšiu (iš telefono / planšetinio kompiuterio); Iš anksto įrašytos dainos; CD / CDG; FM radijas; „MicroSD“ / SD kortelė; USB atmintinė; Kita
ko: 오디오 재생 소스: AUX 라인 입력; 앱 기반(컴패니언 앱); 블루투스 스트리밍(휴대폰/태블릿); 내장 음악; CD/CDG; FM 라디오; MicroSD/SD 카드; USB 플래시 드라이브; 기타
sk-SK: Zdroj prehrávania zvuku: Linkový vstup AUX; Na báze aplikácie (sprievodná aplikácia); Streamovanie cez Bluetooth (z telefónu/tabletu); Vstavané piesne; CD/CDG; FM rádio; Karta MicroSD/SD; USB kľúč; Iné
hu: Hanglejátszási forrás: AUX vonalbemenet; Alkalmazásalapú (kísérőalkalmazás); Bluetooth streamelés (telefonról/táblagépről); Beépített dalok; CD/CDG; FM rádió; MicroSD/SD kártya; USB flash meghajtó; Egyéb
ro-RO: Sursă de redare audio: Intrare linie AUX; Prin aplicație (aplicație asociată); Streaming Bluetooth (de pe telefon/tabletă); Melodii încorporate; CD/CDG; Radio FM; Card MicroSD/SD; Unitate flash USB; Altele
tr: Ses çalma kaynağı: AUX hat girişi; Uygulama tabanlı (yardımcı uygulama); Bluetooth yayını (telefondan/tabletten); Dahili şarkılar; CD/CDG; FM radyo; MicroSD/SD kart; USB flash bellek; Diğer
ru: Источник воспроизведения аудио: Линейный вход AUX; Через приложение (приложение-компаньон); Потоковая передача по Bluetooth (со смартфона или планшета); Встроенные композиции; CD/CDG; FM-радио; Карта MicroSD/SD; USB-накопитель; Другое
el: Πηγή αναπαραγωγής ήχου: Είσοδος AUX line-in; Μέσω εφαρμογής (συνοδευτική εφαρμογή); Μετάδοση μέσω Bluetooth (από τηλέφωνο/tablet); Ενσωματωμένα τραγούδια; CD/CDG; Ραδιόφωνο FM; Κάρτα MicroSD/SD; Μονάδα USB flash; Άλλο
cs: Zdroj přehrávání zvuku: Linkový vstup AUX; Přes aplikaci (doprovodná aplikace); Streamování přes Bluetooth (z telefonu/tabletu); Vestavěné skladby; CD/CDG; FM rádio; Karta microSD/SD; USB flash disk; Ostatní
vi: Nguồn phát lại âm thanh: Đầu vào đường dẫn AUX; Dựa trên ứng dụng (ứng dụng đồng hành); Phát qua Bluetooth (từ điện thoại/máy tính bảng); Bài hát có sẵn; CD/CDG; Đài FM; Thẻ MicroSD/SD; Ổ đĩa flash USB; Khác
bg-BG: Източник на възпроизвеждане на аудио: AUX линеен вход; Базирано на приложение (придружаващо приложение); Bluetooth стрийминг (от телефон/таблет); Вградени песни; CD/CDG; FM радио; MicroSD/SD карта; USB флаш памет; Друго
de: Audiowiedergabequelle: AUX-Line-In; App-basiert (Begleit-App); Bluetooth-Streaming (von Smartphone/Tablet); Integrierte Songs; CD/CDG; UKW-Radio; MicroSD-/SD-Karte; USB-Flash-Laufwerk; Sonstige